Georgia, session 2025_26, SB125.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA
SECTION 1.
Chapter 15 of Title 43 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to professional
engineers and land surveyors, is amended by revising Code Section 43-15-9, relating to
professional engineer certificate of registration and eligibility, as follows:
"43-15-9.
To be eligible for a certificate of registration as a professional engineer, an applicant must
meet the following minimum requirements:
(1)(A) Obtain certification by the board as an engineer-in-training under paragraph (1)
of Code Section 43-15-8;
S. B. 125
- 1 -

LC 46 9001
(B) Acquire a specific record of not less than four years' experience in engineering
work of a character satisfactory to the board which indicates the applicant is competent
to practice professional engineering; and
(C) Subsequently pass Pass a written examination in the principles and practice of
engineering (professional engineer's examination);
(2)(A) Obtain certification by the board as an engineer-in-training under paragraph (2)
of Code Section 43-15-8;
(B) Acquire a specific record of not less than seven years' experience in engineering
work of a character satisfactory to the board which indicates the applicant is competent
to practice professional engineering; and
(C) Subsequently pass Pass a written examination in the principles and practice of
engineering (professional engineer's examination);
(3)(A) Obtain certification by the board as an engineer-in-training under paragraph (3)
of Code Section 43-15-8;
(B) Acquire a specific record of not less than seven years' experience in engineering
work of a character satisfactory to the board which indicates the applicant is competent
to practice professional engineering; and
(C) Subsequently pass Pass a written examination in the principles and practice of
engineering (professional engineer's examination); or
(4)(A) Graduate in an engineering or related science curriculum of not less than four
academic years;
(B) Acquire a specific record of not less than 16 years' experience in engineering work,
of which at least eight years have been in responsible charge of important engineering
work of a character satisfactory to the board, which indicates the applicant is competent
to practice professional engineering; and
(C) Subsequently pass Pass a written examination in the principles and practice of
engineering (professional engineer's examination)."
S. B. 125
- 2 -

LC 46 9001
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 125
- 3 -